Utah statutes.
32B-9-406.   Specific operational requirements for temporary beer event permit.

(1) (a)  In addition to complying with the requirements of Section 32B-9-204, a temporary beer event permittee or a person involved in the storage, sale, offer for sale, or furnishing of beer at the event shall comply with this section.

(b)  Failure to comply as provided in Subsection (1)(a):

(i)  may result in:

(A)  disciplinary action in accordance with Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act, against:

(I)  a temporary beer event permittee;

(II)  a person involved in the storage, sale, offer for sale, or furnishing of beer at the event; or

(III)  any combination of persons listed in this Subsection (1)(b);

(B)  immediate revocation of the temporary beer event permit;

(C)  forfeiture of a bond; or

(D)  immediate seizure of beer present at the event; and

(ii)  if the temporary beer event permit is revoked, disqualifies the temporary beer event permittee from applying for a temporary beer event permit or single event permit for a period of three years from the date of revocation of the temporary beer event permit.

(c)  Beer seized under this Subsection (1) shall be returned to the event permittee after an event if forfeiture proceedings are not instituted under Section 32B-4-206.

(2)  A temporary beer event permittee may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product other than beer pursuant to a temporary beer event permit.

(3) (a)  A temporary beer event permittee shall make and maintain an expense and revenue ledger or record showing:

(i)  expenditures made for beer; and

(ii)  the revenue from sale of beer.

(b)  Section 32B-1-205 applies to a record required to be made or maintained in accordance with this Subsection (3).



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

